Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.270

Legislative—Initiative petition—Submission procedures.

The petitioner preparing an initiative petition for submission to the commission shall follow the procedures established in RCW 35.21.005.

[ 1996 c 286 s 5; 1965 c 7 s 35.17.270. Prior: (i) 1911 c 116 s 21, part; RRS s 9110, part. (ii) 1911 c 116 s 20, part; RRS s 9109, part. (iii) 1911 c 116 s 24; RRS s 9113.]